Utah statutes.
75-5-203.   Objection to appointment.

Any person interested in the welfare of a minor, or a minor of 14 years or older, may file with the court in which the will is probated or the written instrument is filed a written objection to the appointment before it is accepted or within 30 days after notice of its acceptance.  An objection may be withdrawn.  An objection does not preclude, after a hearing on the objection, appointment by the court in a proper proceeding of the testamentary or instrumental nominee, or any other suitable person.

